Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska55-135
National Guard; personnel; number;
grade; service.

The number and grade of officers and enlisted
personnel shall be as prescribed by the United States Department of the Army and the Department of the Air Force
personnel documents provided to the National Guard or as otherwise authorized,
but in case of war, invasion, insurrection, riot, or imminent danger, the
Governor may temporarily increase them to meet such emergencies. All officers
shall hold their commissions until separated by reason of resignation, disability,
or pursuant to applicable regulations issued by the Department of the Army
or the Department of the Air Force. Vacancies among officers shall be filled
by appointment, subject to such regulations relating thereto as now or may
hereafter be promulgated by the United States Government.

Laws 1929, c. 189, § 9, p. 659;

C.S.1929, § 55-114;

Laws 1935, c. 121, § 2, p. 439;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 55-114;

R.S.1943, § 55-114;

Laws 1945, c. 133, § 2, p. 423;

R.R.S.1943, § 55-114;

Laws 1969, c. 459, § 33, p. 1593;

Laws 1978, LB 570, § 1;

Laws 1984, LB 934, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB550, § 6.